Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8004
Individual; use of title; requirements.

(1) An individual shall not use the title of or represent or advertise himself or herself as a certified industrial hygienist, CIH, or C.I.H. unless such individual has received the designation Certified Industrial Hygienist from the American Board of Industrial Hygiene and the designation as such has not lapsed or been revoked.

(2) An individual shall not use for title or professional identification or as a personal credential any variation on the terms described in subsection (1) of this section using the words "Certified Industrial Hygienist" and shall not use initials that indicate such a title unless the individual meets the requirements of this section.

Laws 1997, LB 558, § 4.